Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 48 Educational Services to Very Young Children

16-48-1.
Applicability.

This chapter shall pertain to private nursery schools and other regular programs of educational services to children between the ages of two (2) years eight (8) months and six (6) years of age where the schools and programs operate one or more sessions daily. It does not include bona fide kindergarten and nursery classes which are part of a nonpublic elementary school system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 482, § 1.

16-48-2.
Establishment and operation of schools and programs.

No person, unincorporated society, association, or corporation desiring to operate a school or program as defined in this chapter shall be permitted to establish and maintain a school or program unless and until an application has been filed with the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and suitable provision has been made to fulfill any minimum requirements of adequate faculty, health, safety, sanitation, site, physical plant, educational program, and any other standards that may be established through rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. Upon satisfactory compliance with the standards as established by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, along with the certification by the appropriate fire, health, and building inspectors, the school or program shall be approved for a period of one year, which approval shall require renewal unless sooner revoked by the commissioner for cause.

Upon application to establish a school or program as defined in this chapter or to renew the application, the applicant will submit the names of its owner, officers, and employees. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education may request the bureau of criminal identification of the state police to conduct a nationwide criminal records check of the owners, officers, and employees of the school or program and the bureau of criminal identification of the state police will conduct criminal records checks on request. To accomplish nationwide criminal records checks, the commissioner may require owners, officers, and employees of the schools or programs to be fingerprinted by the bureau of criminal identification of the state police. The commissioner may examine these criminal records checks to aid in determining the suitability of the applicant for approval or renewal of approval.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 4.

16-48-3.
Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall make all necessary rules and regulations as the commissioner shall deem necessary or expedient, in conformity with the provisions of this chapter and not contrary to law, for the necessary accreditation of the schools and programs, and the commissioner shall do all things and perform all acts necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 284, § 1.

16-48-4.
Enforcement.

It shall be the duty of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education to prosecute any person, firm, or corporation violating the provisions of this chapter, and the commissioner or any duly authorized agent of the commissioner may make complaint for the violation of the provisions of this chapter, and the commissioner or agent making the complaint shall not be required to give surety for the payment of cost.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 284, § 1.

16-48-5.
Revocation of approval.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education may revoke or refuse to renew the approval of any nursery school or program approved upon reasonable notice to the school authorities and provided that a hearing on the revocation shall be afforded the parties. Grounds for revocation or refusal to renew shall include:

Failure to maintain standards;

Refusal to submit proper reports or records;

Refusal to admit authorized representatives of the department of elementary and secondary education;

Furnishing or making misleading or false statements or reports;

Failure to maintain adequate financial resources; or

Any other cause which, in the opinion of the commissioner, may be detrimental to the health, education, safety, or welfare of the children involved.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 284, § 1.

16-48-6.
Penalty.

Every person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter by conducting a school or program without first having obtained approval as provided in this chapter, or who shall refuse to permit a reasonable inspection and examination of a facility as provided in this chapter, or who shall intentionally make any false statements or reports to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or the commissioner’s agents with reference to the matters contained in these statements or reports, or who conducts this facility after approval has been revoked or suspended shall, upon conviction of the first offense, be imprisoned for a term not exceeding six (6) months or be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for each week that the facility shall have been maintained without approval, and on the second or subsequent offense shall be imprisoned for a term not exceeding one year or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) for each week that the facility shall have been maintained without approval or both the fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 284, § 1.

16-48-7.
Injunctive relief.

The superior court is empowered and authorized to grant appropriate injunctive relief for violations of the provisions of this chapter. All applications for injunctive relief shall be brought by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education in the superior court. The commissioner may enforce the provisions of this chapter through proceedings either under this section or §

16-48-6

or under both this section and §

16-48-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 172, § 1.

16-48-8.
Destruction of fingerprint records.

At the conclusion of any background check required by this chapter, the state police will promptly destroy the fingerprint card of the applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 66, § 4.

16-48-9.
Non-governmental funding for early childhood education.

There is hereby established in the department of elementary and secondary education an early childhood education program restricted receipt account referred to as “Early Childhood Grant Program Account.” The department of elementary and secondary education shall deposit into this account any funds received from non-governmental sources for the purpose of funding early childhood education programs. All such sums deposited shall be exempt from the indirect cost recovery provisions of §

35-4-27

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 14, § 2.